src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/prestems_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - various - ok : # with different preverbs
     PS/matt+PS/it+itapssi+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [nimattsitsitapssspinnaana, nimattsitsitapssspinnaan]
     PS/maat+PS/a+itapssi+VAI+Ind+3Pl: maataitapssiyi
     PS/apoyi+PS/a+itapssi+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [nitapoyaitapssspinnaan, nitapoyaitapssspinnaana]
     PS/maat+PS/ssk+itapssi+VAI+Ind+3Sg: maatssskitapssiwa
     PS/noohkatt+PS/itap+waami+VAI+Ind+3Sg: noohkattsitapaamiwa
     PS/noohkatt+PS/itap+PS/ssp+waami+VAI+Ind+3Sg: noohkattsitapssspaamiwa
     PS/it+PS/ssk+PS/iksisap+waami+VAI+Ind+3Pl: itsssksiksisapaamiyi
